Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 06. The Director of Insurance.
Sec. 21.06.165.
Immunity for director and others.

The director, employees or agents of the division, and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its employees, are not liable for civil damages for an act or omission in the execution of their authorized activities or duties under this title, or for the publication or dissemination of a report or bulletin related to their authorized activities or duties.

A person may not bring a civil action if the civil action arises out of the act of communicating or delivering information to the director, a representative of the director, or an examiner who is performing an examination under this title.

This section does not abrogate or modify the common law or other statutory privilege or immunity.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of reckless, wilful, or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 6 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) enacted as (d).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former (b)-(c) were relettered as (c)-(d).

Sec. 21.06.170.
Witnesses, evidence, and contempt.

With respect to the subject of an examination, investigation, or hearing being conducted by the director or an examiner, if general written authority has been given the examiner by the director, the director or the examiner may subpoena witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations and examine any person under oath, and may compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other documents by attachments, if necessary. If, in connection with an examination of an insurer, the director desires to examine an officer, director, or manager who is then outside this state, the director is authorized to conduct and to enforce by appropriate and available means an examination under oath in another state or a territory of the United States in which the officer, director, or manager may then presently be, to the full extent permitted by the laws of the other state or territory, this special authorization considered. An administrative law judge from the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) conducting a hearing under this title may, in the course of the hearing, exercise the powers granted to the director under this subsection.

Witness fees and mileage, if claimed, shall be allowed the same as for testimony in a court. Witness fees, mileage, and the actual expenses necessarily incurred in securing attendance of witnesses and their testimony shall be itemized, and shall be paid by the person being examined if the person is found to have violated the law regarding the matter for which the witness was subpoenaed, or shall be paid by the person, if other than the director, at whose request the hearing is held.

Subpoenas of witnesses shall be served in the same manner as if issued from a court.

If a person disobeys or resists a lawful order of the administrative law judge or director, refuses to respond to a subpoena, refuses to take oath or affirmation as a witness, refuses to be examined, or is guilty of misconduct at a hearing or so near the hearing as to obstruct the proceeding, the administrative law judge or director shall certify the facts to the superior court where the hearing is held, and, upon certification, the court shall issue an order directing the person to appear before the court and show cause why the person should not be punished for contempt.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 149 SLA 1984.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 149 SLA 1984; am §§ 39, 40 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.06.180.
Hearings.

The director may hold hearings for any purpose within the scope of this title considered to be necessary.

The office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) shall conduct a hearing on behalf of the director if required under AS

44.64.030

. Otherwise, the director shall conduct a hearing if required by a provision of this title, or upon written demand to the director by a person aggrieved by an act, threatened act, or failure of the director to act, or by a report, regulation, or order of the director (other than an order for the holding of a hearing, or an order on hearing or under it). A demand must specify the grounds to be relied upon at the hearing as a basis for the relief. Except as provided under AS

21.27.420(d)

, unless postponed by mutual consent or for good cause shown, the hearing shall be held within 30 days after receipt by the director of the written demand.

Except as provided under AS

21.27.420(d)

, if, within the 30-day period, the director does not either (1) grant the hearing, or (2) issue an order refusing the hearing, as to the previous report, regulation, or order as to which the person so claims to be aggrieved, the hearing shall be considered to have been refused.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 41 ch 163 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

Sec. 21.06.190.
Stay of action.

Except as provided in AS

21.27.420(d)

, a demand for a hearing received by the director before the effective date of an order issued or within 10 days after an order is delivered stays the effectiveness of the order pending the hearing and an order made thereon, except as to action taken or proposed under an order

on hearing;

under and supplemental to an order on hearing; or

based upon impairment of assets or unsound financial condition of an insurer.

If an automatic stay is not provided for and the director after receipt of a written request for a stay fails to grant it, the person aggrieved may apply to the superior court for a stay of the director’s proposed action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.06.200.
Notice of hearing.

Not less than 20 days in advance, the administrative law judge or director shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing, stating the matters to be considered at the hearing. If the persons to be given notice are not specified in the provision under which the hearing is held, the administrative law judge or director shall give notice to all persons whose pecuniary interests are to be directly and immediately affected by the hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 42 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Sec. 21.06.210.
Hearing procedure.

The administrative law judge or director shall allow a party to the hearing to appear in person and by counsel, to be present during the giving of all evidence, to have a reasonable opportunity to inspect all documentary evidence and to examine witnesses, to present evidence in support of the party’s interest, and to have subpoenas issued by the administrative law judge or director to compel attendance of witnesses and production of evidence in the party’s behalf.

The administrative law judge or director shall permit to become a party to the hearing by intervention, if timely, any person who was not an original party to the proceeding and whose pecuniary interests are to be directly and immediately affected by the director’s order made upon the hearing.

Formal rules of pleading or evidence need not be observed at a hearing.

Upon written request seasonably made by a party to the hearing and at that person’s expense, the administrative law judge or director shall cause a full stenographic record of the proceedings to be made by a competent reporter. If transcribed, a copy of the stenographic record shall be furnished to the director, without cost to the director or the state, and shall be a part of the director’s record of the hearing. If transcribed, a copy of the stenographic record shall be furnished to any other party to the hearing at the request and expense of the other party. If no stenographic record is made or transcribed, the administrative law judge or director shall prepare an adequate record of the evidence and of the proceedings.

Upon written request of a party to a hearing filed with the director within 30 days after an order made pursuant to a hearing has been mailed or delivered to the persons entitled to receive it, the director may grant a rehearing or reargument of the matters involved in the hearing. Notice of the rehearing or reargument must conform to the requirements of AS

21.06.200

.

If the parties agree, the administrative law judge or director may conduct a hearing under this section by teleconference.

A witness at a hearing under this section may testify telephonically.

The administrative law judge or director may close a hearing to the public when the administrative law judge or director finds the closure is necessary to protect a person against unwarranted injury or is in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 13 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 2002; am §§ 43 — 47 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.06.220.
Order on hearing.

In conducting the hearing, the administrative law judge or director shall sit in a quasi-judicial capacity. Within 45 days after termination of the hearing, rehearing, or reargument, the director shall make an order on hearing, covering matters involved in the hearing, rehearing, or reargument, and shall give a copy of the order to the same persons given notice of the hearing.

The order must contain a concise statement of the facts found by the director, the conclusions of the director, and the matters required by AS

21.06.100

.

The order may affirm, modify, or nullify a previous action or may constitute the taking of new action within the scope of the notice of hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 48 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.06.230.
Appeals from the director.

A person aggrieved by an order of the director may appeal the order to the superior court using procedures provided by court rule.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For applicable rules of court, see App.
R. 601-611.

Sec. 21.06.240.
Hearings inapplicable to rate making.

The hearing and appeal procedures provided for in AS

21.06.180

—

21.06.230

do not apply to matters covered by AS 21.39 (Rates and Rating Organizations).

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.06.250.
Fees and licenses.

The director shall collect in advance a fee for each license and for services performed by the division of insurance. Fees may be collected for but are not limited to applications, licenses and license renewals, certificates of authority, service of process, printed or photocopied material, and postage. The director shall adopt regulations setting the fees in an amount the director determines to be sufficient to reimburse the state for the actual expense incurred in providing a service. The director may require by regulation that an insurer or other licensee pay a fee by electronic means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 113 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 206 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For risk retention groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 1.

For purchasing groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 2.

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

Sec. 21.06.255.
Information for child support purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a natural person who applies for a license or requests renewal of a license issued by the director under this title shall provide the director with the person’s social security number. Upon request, the director shall provide a social security number provided under this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 32 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 21.06.260.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]